Utah statutes.
26-1-6.   Fee schedule adopted by department.

(1)  The department may adopt a schedule of fees that may be assessed for services rendered by the department, provided that the fees are:

(a)  reasonable and fair; and

(b)  submitted to the Legislature as part of the department's annual appropriations request.

(2)  When the department submits a fee schedule to the Legislature, the Legislature, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, may:

(a)  approve the fee;

(b)  increase or decrease and approve the fee; or

(c)  reject any fee submitted to it.

(3)  Fees approved by the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state treasury in accordance with Section 63J-1-104.

